Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2320.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 806 of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 806. Officers elected.* * *(c) Newly elected officers training.--Notwithstanding subsection (b), a borough may pay the necessary expenses for a newly elected borough officer to attend educational training provided prior to the beginning of the newly elected officer's term.Section 2. Title 11 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 10705. Newly elected officer training.A city may pay the necessary expenses for a newly elected 12345678910111213141516171819 officer to attend educational training provided prior to the beginning of the newly elected officer's term.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2320PN3094 - 2 - 123